Utah statutes.
77-20-3.   Release on own recognizance -- Changing amount of bail or
conditions of release.
(1) Any person who may be admitted to bail may likewise be released on his own
recognizance in the discretion of the magistrate or court.
(2)  After releasing the defendant on his own recognizance or admitting the
defendant to bail, the magistrate or court may:
(a)  impose bail or increase or decrease the amount of the bail; and
(b)  impose or change the conditions of release under Subsection 77-20-1(2).
